District of Columbia statutes.
28-2302

Assignment of bond or obligation.

An obligee named in a bond or obligation under seal for the payment of money may assign it in writing and the assignee may maintain an action thereon in his own name.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 669, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 28-2302.
1973 Ed., § 28-2302.

Prior Codifications